Illinois, session 104th, HB4439.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1035.1 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1035.1)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-1035.1)7    Sec. 5-1035.1. County Motor Fuel Tax Law. 8    (a) The county board of any county the counties of DuPage, 9Kane, Lake, Will, and McHenry may, by an ordinance or 10resolution adopted by an affirmative vote of a majority of the 11members elected or appointed to the county board, impose a tax 12upon all persons engaged in the county in the business of 13selling motor fuel, as now or hereafter defined in the Motor 14Fuel Tax Law, at retail for the operation of motor vehicles 15upon public highways or for the operation of recreational 16watercraft upon waterways. The collection of a tax under this 17Section based on gallonage of gasoline used for the propulsion 18of any aircraft is prohibited, and the collection of a tax 19based on gallonage of special fuel used for the propulsion of 20any aircraft is prohibited on and after December 1, 2019. The 21county Kane County may exempt diesel fuel from the tax imposed 22pursuant to this Section. The initial tax rate may not be less 23than 4 cents per gallon of motor fuel sold at retail within the   HB4439- 2 -LRB104 17805 TRT 31238 b1county for the purpose of use or consumption and not for the 2purpose of resale and may not exceed 8 cents per gallon of 3motor fuel sold at retail within the county for the purpose of 4use or consumption and not for the purpose of resale. The 5proceeds from the tax shall be used by the county solely for 6the purposes of operating, constructing, and improving public 7highways, waterways, shared-use paths for nonvehicular public 8travel, sidewalks, and bike paths, and acquiring real property 9and rights-of-way for public highways, waterways, shared-use 10paths for nonvehicular public travel, sidewalks, and bike 11paths within the county imposing the tax, and maintaining and 12constructing essential transportation-related infrastructure.13    (a-5) By June 1, 2020, and by June 1 of each year 14thereafter, the Department of Revenue shall determine an 15annual rate increase to take effect on July 1 of that calendar 16year and continue through June 30 of the next calendar year. 17Not later than June 1 of each year, the Department of Revenue 18shall publish on its website the rate that will take effect on 19July 1 of that calendar year. The rate shall be equal to the 20rate in effect increased by an amount equal to the percentage 21increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 22Consumers for all items, published by the United States 23Department of Labor for the 12 months ending in March of each 24year. The rate shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one 25cent. Each new rate may not exceed the rate in effect on June 2630 of the previous year plus one cent.   HB4439- 3 -LRB104 17805 TRT 31238 b1    (b) A tax imposed pursuant to this Section, and all civil 2penalties that may be assessed as an incident thereof, shall 3be administered, collected, and enforced by the Illinois 4Department of Revenue in the same manner as the tax imposed 5under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, as now or hereafter 6amended, insofar as may be practicable; except that in the 7event of a conflict with the provisions of this Section, this 8Section shall control. The Department of Revenue shall have 9full power: to administer and enforce this Section; to collect 10all taxes and penalties due hereunder; to dispose of taxes and 11penalties so collected in the manner hereinafter provided; and 12to determine all rights to credit memoranda arising on account 13of the erroneous payment of tax or penalty hereunder.14    (b-5) Persons subject to any tax imposed under the 15authority granted in this Section may reimburse themselves for 16their seller's tax liability hereunder by separately stating 17that tax as an additional charge, which charge may be stated in 18combination, in a single amount, with State tax which sellers 19are required to collect under the Use Tax Act, pursuant to such 20bracket schedules as the Department may prescribe. 21    (c) Whenever the Department determines that a refund shall 22be made under this Section to a claimant instead of issuing a 23credit memorandum, the Department shall notify the State 24Comptroller, who shall cause the order to be drawn for the 25amount specified, and to the person named, in the notification 26from the Department. The refund shall be paid by the State   HB4439- 4 -LRB104 17805 TRT 31238 b1Treasurer out of the County Option Motor Fuel Tax Fund.2    (d) The Department shall forthwith pay over to the State 3Treasurer, ex officio, as trustee, all taxes and penalties 4collected hereunder, which shall be deposited into the County 5Option Motor Fuel Tax Fund, a special fund in the State 6Treasury which is hereby created. On or before the 25th day of 7each calendar month, the Department shall prepare and certify 8to the State Comptroller the disbursement of stated sums of 9money to named counties for which taxpayers have paid taxes or 10penalties hereunder to the Department during the second 11preceding calendar month. The amount to be paid to each county 12shall be the amount (not including credit memoranda) collected 13hereunder from retailers within the county during the second 14preceding calendar month by the Department, but not including 15an amount equal to the amount of refunds made during the second 16preceding calendar month by the Department on behalf of the 17county; less 2% of the balance, which sum shall be retained by 18the State Treasurer to cover the costs incurred by the 19Department in administering and enforcing the provisions of 20this Section. The Department, at the time of each monthly 21disbursement to the counties, shall prepare and certify to the 22Comptroller the amount so retained by the State Treasurer, 23which shall be transferred into the Tax Compliance and 24Administration Fund.25    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 26authorize a county to impose a tax upon the privilege of   HB4439- 5 -LRB104 17805 TRT 31238 b1engaging in any business which under the Constitution of the 2United States may not be made the subject of taxation by this 3State.4    (f) Until January 1, 2020, an ordinance or resolution 5imposing a tax hereunder or effecting a change in the rate 6thereof shall be effective on the first day of the second 7calendar month next following the month in which the ordinance 8or resolution is adopted and a certified copy thereof is filed 9with the Department of Revenue, whereupon the Department of 10Revenue shall proceed to administer and enforce this Section 11on behalf of the county as of the effective date of the 12ordinance or resolution.13    On and after January 1, 2020, an ordinance or resolution 14imposing or discontinuing the tax hereunder or effecting a 15change in the rate thereof shall either: (i) be adopted and a 16certified copy thereof filed with the Department on or before 17the first day of April, whereupon the Department shall proceed 18to administer and enforce this Section as of the first day of 19July next following the adoption and filing; or (ii) be 20adopted and a certified copy thereof filed with the Department 21on or before the first day of October, whereupon the 22Department shall proceed to administer and enforce this 23Section as of the first day of January next following the 24adoption and filing. 25    (g) This Section shall be known and may be cited as the 26County Motor Fuel Tax Law.  HB4439- 6 -LRB104 17805 TRT 31238 b1(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 101-32, eff. 6-28-19; 2101-275, eff. 8-9-19; 101-604, eff. 12-13-19; 102-452, eff. 38-20-21.)